Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska87-137
Classification of goods and services; rules and regulations.

The secretary shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations which establish a classification of goods and services for convenience of administration of the Trademark Registration Act, but such rules and regulations shall not limit or extend the applicant's or registrant's rights and a single application for registration of a mark may include any or all goods upon which, or services with which, the mark is actually being used indicating the appropriate class or classes of goods or services. When a single application includes goods or services which fall within multiple classes, the secretary may require payment of a fee for each class. To the extent practicable, the classification of goods and services should conform to the classification adopted by the United States Patent and Trademark Office.

Laws 2000, LB 626, § 12.